Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1728
Acquisition agent; register information; bond.

An acquisition agent, including the developer if it is also the acquisition agent, shall register with the commission the time-share program or programs that it is providing prospective purchasers for, its principal office address and telephone number, and designate who its responsible managing employee is. The acquisition agent shall furnish evidence that a bond of five thousand dollars has been placed with a surety company or a cash bond with the commission to cover any violations of any solicitation ordinances, zoning ordinances, building codes, or other regulations governing the use of the premise or premises in which the time-share program is promoted.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 28.